Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1504
Seal; certified copies of records as evidence.

The Director of Motor Vehicles shall adopt a seal. Copies of all records or other instruments in the department, when certified by the director as true copies and bearing the seal thereof, shall be received in any court as prima facie evidence of the original records or instruments.

Laws 1957, c. 366, § 57, p. 1284.